Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska40-106
Homestead; selection; application; contents.

The application must show (1) the fact that an execution has been levied upon property which is claimed as a homestead, (2) the name of the judgment creditor, (3) the facts which give rise to a homestead exemption, and (4) the value of the homestead.

Laws 1879, § 6, p. 59;

R.S.1913, § 3081;

C.S.1922, § 2821;

C.S.1929, § 40-106;

R.S.1943, § 40-106;

Laws 1947, c. 153, § 2, p. 420.

Procedure for selection of homestead was in conformity with statute. Sanne v. Sanne, 167 Neb. 683, 94 N.W.2d 367 (1959).